Oklahoma, session 2026, SB370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 509.11, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 509.11. A. No school district, employee of a school

district, or employee organization shall deny by any means,

including a collective bargaining agreement, a statewide

professional educators’ association equal access to employees of the

school district, to the same extent that access is granted to other

educators’ associations. For purposes of this section, access shall

include, but is not limited to:



Req. No. 571 Page 1

1. Setting up informational tables at in-service or other

similar teacher meetings;

2. Speaking at in-service or other similar teacher meetings;

3. Distributing information in school mail boxes or through the

school e-mail system;

4. Utilizing school district meeting rooms during nonworking

hours;

5. Representing employees in employment matters, when requested

by the employee;

6. Posting information on school district bulletin boards; and

7. Utilizing school district printing services.

B. Any association which utilizes school district facilities or

services shall reimburse the district for any costs incurred by the

district.

C. A school district is prohibited from:

1. Requiring or coercing school district employees to meet,

communicate, listen to, or otherwise interact with an employee

organization or statewide professional educators’ association;

2. Distributing communications or membership solicitations on

behalf of an employee organization or statewide professional

educators’ association; and

3. Permitting an employee organization or statewide

professional educators’ association access to or use of the school

district’s meetings, events, facilities, communications systems,

Req. No. 571 Page 2

comp uter systems, equipment, supplies, or other resources on terms

more favorable than extended to any other employee organization or

statewide professional educators’ association seeking similar access

or use.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-571 EB 1/14/2025 3:50:38 PM



























Req. No. 571 Page 3